Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB128.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4503(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4503. Exemptions from jury duty.(a) General rule.--No person shall be exempt or excused from jury duty except the following:* * *(9) Emergency service personnel who request to be excused.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415